Missouri, session 2026, SB1773.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 407.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 407.020,
to read as follows:
407.020. 1. The act, use or employment by any person
of any deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise,
misrepresentation, unfair practice or the concealment,
suppression, or omission of any material fact in connection
with the sale or advertisement of any merchandise in trade
or commerce or the solicitation of any funds for any
charitable purpose, as defined in section 407.453, in or
from the state of Missouri, is declared to be an unlawful
practice. The use by any person, in connection with the
sale or advertisement of any merchandise in trade or
commerce or the solicitation of any funds for any charitable
purpose, as defined in section 407.453, in or from the state
of Missouri of the fact that the attorney general has
approved any filing required by this chapter as the
approval, sanction or endorsement of any activity, project
or action of such person, is declared to be an unlawful
practice. Any act, use or employment declared unlawful by

SB 1773 2
this subsection violates this subsection whether committed
before, during or after the sale, advertisement or
solicitation.
2. Nothing contained in this section shall apply to:
(1) The owner or publisher of any newspaper, magazine,
publication or printed matter wherein such advertisement
appears, or the owner or operator of a radio or television
station which disseminates such advertisement when the
owner, publisher or operator has no knowledge of the intent,
design or purpose of the advertiser;
(2) Any institution, company, or entity that is
subject to chartering, licensing, or regulation by the
director of the department of commerce and insurance under
chapter 354 or chapters 374 to 385, the director of the
division of credit unions under chapter 370, or director of
the division of finance under chapters 361 to 369, or
chapter 371, unless such directors specifically authorize
the attorney general to implement the powers of this chapter
or such powers are provided to either the attorney general
or a private citizen by statute; or
(3) Any advertisement, merchandise, or transaction in
which the merchandise consists of a new residence in a
transaction in which the buyer is offered and accepts in the
sale contract an express warranty by the builder or through
a third-party warranty company paid for by the builder and
the sale contract contains substantially the following
disclaimer in all capital letters with characters of at
least ten-point type: "THIS CONTRACT, MERCHANDISE AND
PROPERTY CONVEYED UNDER THIS CONTRACT AND THE TRANSACTION
BETWEEN THE SELLER AND BUYER IS EXCLUDED FROM COVERAGE UNDER
THE MERCHANDISING PRACTICES ACT, SECTIONS 407.010 TO
407.130, RSMO.". As used in this section, the term

SB 1773 3
"residence" shall mean a single-family house, duplex,
triplex, quadruplex, or a unit in a multiunit residential
structure in which title to each individual unit is
transferred to the owner under a condominium or cooperative
system and shall include common areas and common elements as
defined in subdivision (4) of section 448.1-103.
3. Any person who willfully and knowingly engages in
any act, use, employment or practice declared to be unlawful
by this section with the intent to defraud shall be guilty
of a class E felony.
4. It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney
and circuit attorney in their respective jurisdictions to
commence any criminal actions under this section, and the
attorney general shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
to commence such criminal actions throughout the state where
such violations have occurred.
5. It shall be an unlawful practice for any long-term
care facility, as defined in section 192.2300, except a
facility which is a residential care facility or an assisted
living facility, as defined in section 198.006, which makes,
either orally or in writing, representation to residents,
prospective residents, their families or representatives
regarding the quality of care provided, or systems or
methods utilized for assurance or maintenance of standards
of care to refuse to provide copies of documents which
reflect the facility's evaluation of the quality of care,
except that the facility may remove information that would
allow identification of any resident. If the facility is
requested to provide any copies, a reasonable amount, as
established by departmental rule, may be charged.
6. Any long-term care facility, as defined in section
192.2300, which commits an unlawful practice under this

SB 1773 4
section shall be liable for damages in a civil action of up
to one thousand dollars for each violation, and attorney's
fees and costs incurred by a prevailing plaintiff, as
allowed by the circuit court.
7. Unlawful practices under subsection 1 of this
section shall include, but shall not be limited to, any
violation of sections 149.200 to 149.215, sections 173.600
to 173.618, subsection 3 of section 196.1023, section
304.158, subsection 2 of section 376.414, subsection 11 of
section 376.1850, sections 407.660 to 407.664, sections
407.670 to 407.678, section 407.800, sections 407.1070 to
407.1085, sections 407.1120 to 407.1132, sections 436.400 to
436.520, subdivision (3) of subsection 4 of section 643.315,
section 700.076, and sections 700.010 to 700.115 except as
provided in subsections 2 and 3 of section 700.115.
✓